Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-219
Department of Justice Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Department of Justice Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the Attorney General and shall consist of funds received from other governmental agencies for the provision of legal services pursuant to agreements with the Department of Justice. Money in the fund shall be used to pay the salaries and related expenses of department staff pursuant to the terms of such agreements.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 144.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.